Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1525.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "line" or "facility" in section 1 of the act of December 10, 1974 (P.L.852, No.287), referred to as the Underground Utility Line Protection Law, is amended to read:Section 1. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Line" or "facility" means an underground conductor or 123456789101112131415161718192021 underground pipe or structure used in providing electric or communication service, or an underground pipe used in carrying, gathering, transporting or providing natural or artificial gas, petroleum, propane, oil or petroleum and production product, sewage, water, steam or other service to one or more transportation carriers, consumers or customers of such service and the appurtenances thereto, regardless of whether such line or structure is located on land owned by a person or public agency or whether it is located within an easement or right-of-way. The term shall include unexposed storm drainage and traffic loops that are not clearly visible[. The term shall include], unconventional oil and gas well production and gathering lines or facilities and pipelines transporting steam OR HAZARDOUS MATERIAL located in public rights-of-way . The term shall not include stripper well lines unless the line or facility is a regulated onshore gathering line as defined in regulations promulgated after January 1, 2006, by the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to the Pipeline Safety Act of 1992 (Public Law 102-508, 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.), if the regulated gathering line is subject to the damage prevention program requirements of 49 CFR § 192.614.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1525PN2542 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223